Illinois, session 104th, HB4685.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by adding 5Section 10-3.2 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/10-3.2 new)7    Sec. 10-3.2. Unlawful restraint for civil immigration 8enforcement.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Civil immigration enforcement" means the execution or 11attempted execution of any non-criminal arrests or detentions 12ordered or authorized by an immigration agent. "Civil 13immigration enforcement" does not include actions related to 14the enforcement of federal criminal charges, or the execution 15or attempted execution of a federal criminal warrant.16    "Express legal authority" means clear oral or written 17instructions from an immigration agent granting an individual 18employed or otherwise acting on behalf of an immigration 19agency the authorization to detain or transfer a specific 20individual.21    "Immigration agent" means an agent of federal Immigration 22and Customs Enforcement, federal Customs and Border 23Protection, or any similar or successor agency, or any other   HB4685- 2 -LRB104 19430 RLC 32878 b1individual with the power to arrest or detain individuals or 2manage custody of detained individuals for purposes of civil 3immigration enforcement while acting in that capacity or 4conducting investigations or enforcement pursuant to that 5power. 6    (b) A person commits unlawful restraint for civil 7immigration enforcement when he or she knowingly and without 8express legal authority from an immigration agent:9        (1) detains another for the purpose of civil 10    immigration enforcement;11        (2) by force or threat of imminent force transfers 12    another person from one place to another with the intent 13    to detain the other person for civil immigration 14    enforcement;15        (3) by deceit or enticement induces another person to 16    transfer from one place to another with intent to detain 17    the other person for civil immigration enforcement; or18        (4) uses a deadly weapon while detaining or 19    transferring another person from one place to another with 20    the intent to detain the other person for civil 21    immigration enforcement. 22    (c) This Section does not apply to any immigration agent. 23    (d) Sentence. A violation of paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of 24subsection (b) is a Class 4 felony. A violation of paragraph 25(4) of subsection (b) is a Class 3 felony.